Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-805
Appropriations; failure to meet criteria; effect.

Any legislation not meeting the criteria established in section 49-804 shall not be considered a valid appropriation as defined in Article III, section 22, of the Nebraska Constitution.

Laws 1979, LB 232, § 2.